Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES; CHILD WELFARE FISCAL ANALYSIS, PROGRAM AND PRACTICE EVALUATION, AND RECOMMENDATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Child welfare fiscal analysis. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families must contract with a third-party consultant, selected according to subdivision 2, to conduct a child welfare fiscal analysis. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Fiscal analysis consultant selection. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the Association of Minnesota Counties, the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council, community nonprofits, community providers, and other child welfare system stakeholders, must select a third-party independent consultant to conduct the fiscal analysis required under this section. The consultant must have national expertise in and experience with child welfare systems and conducting fiscal analyses, which may include experience conducting a similar fiscal analysis of another state's claim processes under the Family First Prevention Services Act and the state's federal Title IV-E and Title IV-B reimbursement processes. new text end new text begin (b) Except for the contract to perform the fiscal analysis under this section, the third-party consultant selected under this subdivision must not receive funding from any other entity in Minnesota, including state, local, and Tribal government agencies or programs, at any time while conducting the fiscal analysis and preparing recommendations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Child welfare fiscal analysis requirements. new text end new text begin When conducting the child welfare fiscal analysis under this section, the third-party consultant must evaluate: new text end new text begin (1) financial systems in Minnesota's child welfare system and funding sources available to the child welfare system; new text end new text begin (2) current state, county, and Tribal agency staff responsible for child welfare system budgeting and reimbursement and staff skills and resources necessary for obtaining, managing, and distributing federal funds to counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (3) the state's access to and use of funding or reimbursements under federal Title IV-E and Title IV-B, the federal Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act, TANF, Medicaid, the federal Social Services Block Grant Program, and other federal funds for expenses related to child welfare, including legal representation, training, and prevention services; new text end new text begin (4) relevant information needed to secure available federal funds for the child welfare system; new text end new text begin (5) the implementation of the Family First Prevention Services Act and related claim processes; new text end new text begin (6) the social service information system, including the system's ability to efficiently integrate child welfare information and manage, track, and share information between the state, counties, and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (7) federal Title IV-E attorney and training reimbursements in the state and all allowable Title IV-E administrative costs; new text end new text begin (8) eligibility of federal Title IV-E funding or reimbursements for the following categories of legal representation in child welfare cases: new text end new text begin (i) parent representation; new text end new text begin (ii) child representation; new text end new text begin (iii) paralegal duties, support, and mentoring; new text end new text begin (iv) relative and kin representation; new text end new text begin (v) Tribal legal representation; new text end new text begin (vi) prepetition legal services; and new text end new text begin (vii) other civil legal services; and new text end new text begin (9) the Tribal consultation policy under Minnesota Statutes, section 10.65, and how often the consultations occur. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report on fiscal analysis. new text end new text begin By June 30, 2027, the third-party consultant who conducted the child welfare fiscal analysis under this section must submit a final report to the commissioner of children, youth, and families; commissioner of human services; and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the child welfare system. The final report must include the findings from the fiscal analysis required in this section. The report must also include recommendations on: new text end new text begin (1) whether Minnesota should increase state investment into the child welfare system; new text end new text begin (2) how to maximize the state's receipt of federal reimbursements; new text end new text begin (3) legislative proposals for any necessary statutory changes; and new text end new text begin (4) administrative and fiscal resources needed to implement necessary statutory changes. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Child welfare practice and program evaluation and recommendations. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families must contract with a third-party consultant to conduct a comprehensive evaluation of programs, practices, and services in the child welfare system in Minnesota to develop a comprehensive set of practice and programmatic recommendations that provide a framework for the child welfare system. Recommendations may address alignment of funding to support programs and services that reduce or eliminate inequities in the system while achieving the best outcomes for children and families. In conducting the evaluation, the consultant must engage with: new text end new text begin (1) local social services agencies; new text end new text begin (2) community-based agencies and advocates that serve children and families in the child welfare system; new text end new text begin (3) individuals with lived experience in the child welfare system; and new text end new text begin (4) other individuals and stakeholders identified by the advisory task force in subdivision 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reports on practice and program evaluation. new text end new text begin (a) By July 1, 2027, the third-party consultant conducting the evaluation under subdivision 5 must provide a status report to the commissioner of children, youth, and families; the commissioner of human services; and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the child welfare system. The report must include a summary of the consultant's work completed as of the date of the report and initial recommendations, if any. new text end new text begin (b) By July 1, 2028, the third-party consultant conducting the evaluation under subdivision 5 must provide a final report on the required evaluation and recommendations to the commissioner of children, youth, and families; the commissioner of human services; and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the child welfare system. The final report must include legislative proposals for any necessary statutory changes and recommendations on administrative and fiscal resources needed to implement necessary statutory changes. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Advisory task force. new text end new text begin (a) An advisory task force is established to support and advise the third-party consultant or consultants during the fiscal analysis required under subdivisions 1 and 3 and the program evaluation and practice recommendations under subdivision 5. The consultant or consultants must meet regularly with the task force throughout the analysis, program evaluation, and report preparation. The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) assist the consultant or consultants with obtaining data and information needed for the fiscal analysis and program evaluation; new text end new text begin (2) provide advice and support to the consultant or consultants regarding the goals and timeline of the fiscal analysis and program evaluation; and new text end new text begin (3) advise the consultant or consultants as needed for the duration of the fiscal analysis and program evaluation. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory task force shall consist of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two members who are employees of the Department of Children, Youth, and Families who have expertise in child welfare appointed by the commissioner of children, youth, and families; new text end new text begin (2) one member who is an employee of the Department of Human Services who has expertise in services and programming for individuals with disabilities, substance use disorder, or mental health needs appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (3) two members appointed by the Minnesota Association of County Social Service Administrators; new text end new text begin (4) one member appointed by the foster youth ombudsperson; new text end new text begin (5) the ombudsperson for African American families or a designee; new text end new text begin (6) the ombudsperson for American Indian families or a designee; new text end new text begin (7) the ombudsperson for Asian-Pacific families or a designee; new text end new text begin (8) the ombudsperson for Spanish-speaking families or a designee; new text end new text begin (9) one member appointed by the Minnesota Children's Justice Initiative; new text end new text begin (10) two members appointed by the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council; and new text end new text begin (11) two members of the public who work in the children's prevention services community appointed by the governor. new text end new text begin (c) The advisory task force is governed by Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, and expires 30 days after the submission of the final reports under subdivisions 4 and 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Tribal participation. new text end new text begin Each of Minnesota's 11 federally recognized Tribal Nations may participate in the fiscal analysis or program evaluation required under this section. Tribal Nations that choose to participate have sovereignty over data they choose to share with the consultant or other individuals or entities and may request that their data not be included in any public documents. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CHILD WELFARE FISCAL ANALYSIS AND PROGRAM EVALUATION AND RECOMMENDATIONS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families to contract with a third-party consultant to conduct an independent fiscal analysis of the child welfare system in Minnesota and to contract with a third-party consultant to conduct a comprehensive evaluation of programs, practices, and services in the child welfare system in Minnesota and develop comprehensive practice and programmatic recommendations. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until expended. new text end